Washington statutes.
RCW 18.420.800

Report—Supervisor supply adequacy.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1427-S2.SL) ***

(1) The department, in consultation with the *advisory committee, shall conduct an assessment and submit a report to the governor and the committees of the legislature with jurisdiction over health policy issues by December 1, 2027.

(2) The report in subsection (1) of this section shall provide:

(a) An analysis of the adequacy of the supply of certified peer specialists serving as approved supervisors pursuant to RCW 18.420.010(2)(b) with respect to the ability to meet the anticipated supervision needs of certified peer specialist trainees upon the expiration of behavioral health providers serving as approved supervisors pursuant to RCW 18.420.010(2)(a);

(b) An assessment of whether or not it is necessary to extend the expiration of behavioral health providers serving as approved supervisors pursuant to RCW 18.420.010(2)(a) in order to meet the anticipated supervision needs of certified peer specialist trainees;

(c) Recommendations for increasing the supply of certified peer specialists serving as approved supervisors pursuant to RCW 18.420.010(2)(b), including any potential modifications to the requirements to become an approved supervisor; and

(d) Recommendations for alternative methods of providing supervision to certified peer specialist trainees, including options for team-based supervision that incorporate supervision from both behavioral health providers serving as approved supervisors pursuant to RCW 18.420.010(2)(a) and certified peer specialists serving as approved supervisors pursuant to RCW 18.420.010(2)(b).

[ 2023 c 469 s 11.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: 2023 c 469 s 4, which established the Washington state certified peer specialist advisory committee, was vetoed by the governor.